Hawaii, session 2025, GM1167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the department of
education is responsible for submitting an annual computer
science legislative report by June 30 every year. However, the
department of education has recommended the inclusion of
academic quarter four computer science data from the schools in
the report, and the existing June 30 due date prohibits the
inclusion of that data. Thus, the department of education
prefers to delay the due date for the report to provide a more
robust computer science report.
Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to change the due
date of the department of education's annual computer science
legislative report from June 30 to October 31.
SECTION 2. Section 302A-323, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows:
" (e) By [June 30,—2022-,-] October 31, 2025, and by each
[June 30] October 31 thereafter, the superintendent shall submit
to the board and legislature a report of the computer science
2025-2134 HB622 SDl SMA.docx

Page 2 H.B. NO. "

courses and computer science content offered during the previous
school year at the schools in each complex area. The report
shall include:
(1) The names and course codes of the computer science
courses offered at each school;
(2) The number and percentage of students enrolled in each
computer science course and computer science content,
disaggregated by:
(A) Gender;
(B) Race and ethnicity;
(C) Special education status, including students
eligible for special education under the federal
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, as
amended, or section 504 of the federal
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended;
(D) English language learner status;
(E) Eligibility for the free and reduced price lunch
program; and
(F) Grade level;
provided that if a category contains one to five
students, or contains an amount that would allow the
2025-2134 HB622 SDl SMA.docx

Page 3
H.B. NO.
amount of another category that contains one to five
students to be determined, the number of students
shall be replaced with a symbol indicating that one to
five students fulfilled that particular category;
(3) The names and course codes of the courses containing
computer science content and a description of the
computer science standards and content that are
covered by those courses; and
(4) The number of computer science instructors at each
school, disaggregated by:
(A) Any applicable certification;
(B) Gender;
(C) Race and ethnicity; and
(D) Highest academic degree earned."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2134 HB622 SDl SMA.docx
lllllilllllllllilllllMIIIII

H.B. NO. g;
APPROVED this 19th day of May ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 622, HD 1,SD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 25, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 622, H.D. 1, S.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 3, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
1488